Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.180

Commercial pesticide applicator license—Suspension of license for failure to meet financial responsibility criteria.

The commercial pesticide applicator license shall, whenever the licensee's surety bond or insurance policy is reduced below the requirements of RCW 17.21.170 or whenever the commercial applicator has not supplied evidence of financial responsibility, as required by RCW 17.21.160 and 17.21.170, by the expiration date of the previous policy or surety bond, be automatically suspended until such licensee's surety bond or insurance policy again meets the requirements of RCW 17.21.170. In addition, the director may pick up such licensee's license plates during such period of automatic suspension and return them only at such time as the licensee has furnished written proof that he or she is in compliance with the provisions of RCW 17.21.170.

[ 1994 c 283 s 21; 1989 c 380 s 50; 1987 c 45 s 31; 1967 c 177 s 11; 1961 c 249 s 18.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.